Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3185.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 45-62-5.1 and 45-62-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-62 entitled
"Dam Management Districts" are hereby amended to read as follows:
45-62-5.1. Immunity from civil liability.
(a) Pascoag Reservoir Dam Management District created pursuant to this chapter shall be
immune from civil liability for any tort committed upon any lake bed the Pascoag Reservoir Dam
Management District may acquire, hold, use or lease pursuant to § 45-62-3.
(b) Wilson's Reservoir Dam Management District created pursuant to this chapter shall be
immune from civil liability for any tort committed upon any lake bed the Wilson's Reservoir Dam
Management District may acquire, hold, use or lease pursuant to § 45-62-3.
45-62-7. Exemption from real and personal property taxes.
(a) The towns of Burriville and Glocester are authorized to enact ordinances which exempt
from taxation real and personal property owned by a Dam Management District created pursuant
to this chapter, said exemption to be limited to property that consists of the lake bed of the Pascoag
Reservoir, also known as Echo Lake and property on which any dam, spillway and any appurtenant
structures may be located as the same relate to the Pascoag Reservoir, also known as Echo Lake.
(b)(1) The town of Burrillville may by ordinance exempt from taxation real and personal
property owned by a dam management district created pursuant to this chapter, said exemptions to
be limited to property that consists of the lake bed of Wilson’s Reservoir (Burrillville assessor’s
map 138, lot 041; map 016, lot 038; and map 156, lot 064), and property on which any dam,

spillway and any appurtenant structures may be located as the same relate to the Wilson’s
Reservoir.
(2) With respect to the town of Burrillville, collection of dam management district fees
shall be in the same manner as provided by law for the collection of taxes by municipalities and the
collector of fees for said management district and have the same powers and authority as are by
law conferred on collection of taxes for towns in the state.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006271/SUB A
========
LC006271/SUB A - Page 2 of 3